src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/adj-odd_gt-desc.ana.yaml
  Adj - duŋggas: # HEAHKAS
    duŋggas+A+Attr: [duŋggasis, duŋga]
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Gen: duŋgasa
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: duŋgas
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Ill: duŋgasii
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Com: duŋgasiin
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: duŋgasiinna
    duŋggas+A+Pl+Com: duŋgasiiguin
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [duŋgaseappuid, duŋgasabbuid]
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [duŋgaseappuid, duŋgasebbuid, duŋgasabbuid]
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [duŋgaseappuid, duŋgasebbuid, duŋgasabbuid]
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [duŋgaseappuid, duŋgasabbuid]
    duŋggas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: duŋgasit

  Adj - goavššas: # HEAHKAS
    goavššas+A+Attr: goavššasis
    goavššas+A+Sg+Gen: goakšasa
    goavššas+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: goakšas
    goavššas+A+Sg+Ill: goakšasii
    goavššas+A+Sg+Com: goakšasiin
    goavššas+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: goakšasiinna
    goavššas+A+Pl+Com: goakšasiiguin
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [goakšaseappuid, goakšasabbuid]
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [goakšaseappuid, goakšasebbuid, goakšasabbuid]
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [goakšaseappuid, goakšasebbuid, goakšasabbuid]
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [goakšaseappuid, goakšasabbuid]
    goavššas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goakšasit

  Adj - boahkis: # BOAKKAS
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen: boahkkása
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: boahkkás
    boahkis+A+Sg+Ill: boahkkásii
    boahkis+A+Sg+Com: boahkkásiin
    boahkis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: boahkkásiinna
    boahkis+A+Pl+Com: boahkkásiiguin
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásebbuid, boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásebbuid, boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [boahkkáseappuid,  boahkkásabbuid]
    boahkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: boahkkásit

  Adj - gearpmus: # GAPPUS
    gearpmus+A+Attr: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen: gerbmosa
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: gerbmos
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Ill: gerbmosii
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Com: gerbmosiin
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: gerbmosiinna
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Com: gerbmosiiguin
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosebbuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosebbuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosabbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gerbmosit

  Adj - lámis: # VATTIS
    lámis+A+Attr: [lámes, lámisis]
    lámis+A+Err/Orth+Attr: lámis
    lámis+A+Sg+Gen: lápmása
    lámis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: lápmás
    lámis+A+Sg+Ill: lápmásii
    lámis+A+Sg+Com: lápmásiin
    lámis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: lápmásiinna
    lámis+A+Pl+Com: lápmásiiguin
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [lápmáseappuid, lápmásabbuid]
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [lápmáseappuid, lápmásebbuid, lápmásabbuid]
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [lápmáseappuid, lápmásebbuid, lápmásabbuid]
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [lápmáseappuid, lápmásabbuid]
    lámis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: lápmásit

  Adj - biekkus: # BIEKKUS
    biekkus+A+Attr: biekkusis
    biekkus+A+Sg+Gen: biggosa
    biekkus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: biggos
    biekkus+A+Sg+Ill: biggosii
    biekkus+A+Sg+Com: biggosiin
    biekkus+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: biggosiinna
    biekkus+A+Pl+Com: biggosiiguin
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [biggoseappuid, biggosabbuid]
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [biggoseappuid, biggosebbuid, biggosabbuid]
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [biggoseappuid, biggosebbuid, biggosabbuid]
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [biggoseappuid, biggosabbuid]
    biekkus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: biggosit

  Adj - roattus: # LIEKKUS
    roattus+A+Attr: [roattus, roattusis]
    roattus+A+Sg+Gen: roddosa
    roattus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: roddos
    roattus+A+Sg+Ill: roddosii
    roattus+A+Sg+Com: roddosiin
    roattus+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: roddosiinna
    roattus+A+Pl+Com: roddosiiguin
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [roddoseappuid, roddosabbuid]
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [roddoseappuid, roddosebbuid, roddosabbuid]
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [roddoseappuid, roddosebbuid, roddosabbuid]
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [roddoseappuid, roddosabbuid]
    roattus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roddosit

  Adj - guoros: # GUOROS
    guoros+A+Attr: guoros
    guoros+A+Sg+Gen: gurrosa
    guoros+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: gurros
    guoros+A+Sg+Ill: gurrosii
    guoros+A+Sg+Com: gurrosiin
    guoros+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: gurrosiinna
    guoros+A+Pl+Com: gurrosiiguin
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gurroseappuid, gurrosabbuid]
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [gurroseappuid, gurrosebbuid, gurrosabbuid]
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [gurroseappuid, gurrosebbuid, gurrosabbuid]
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [gurroseappuid, gurrosabbuid]
    guoros+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gurrosit

  Adj - ruojus: # NUOLUS
    ruojus+A+Attr: ruojos
    ruojus+A+Err/Orth+Attr: ruojus
    ruojus+A+Sg+Gen: rudjosa
    ruojus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: rudjos
    ruojus+A+Sg+Ill: rudjosii
    ruojus+A+Sg+Com: rudjosiin
    ruojus+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: rudjosiinna
    ruojus+A+Pl+Com: rudjosiiguin
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [rudjoseappuid, rudjosabbuid]
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [rudjoseappuid, rudjosebbuid, rudjosabbuid]
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [rudjoseappuid, rudjosebbuid, rudjosabbuid]
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [rudjoseappuid, rudjosabbuid]
    ruojus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rudjosit

  Adj - gearggus: # GEARGGUS
    gearggus+A+Attr: gearggos
    gearggus+A+Sg+Gen: gergosa
    gearggus+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: gergos
    gearggus+A+Sg+Ill: gergosii
    gearggus+A+Sg+Com: gergosiin
    gearggus+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: gergosiinna
    gearggus+A+Pl+Com: gergosiiguin
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gergoseappuid, gergosabbuid]
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [gergoseappuid, gergosebbuid, gergosabbuid]
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [gergoseappuid, gergosebbuid, gergosabbuid]
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [gergoseappuid, gergosabbuid]
    gearggus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gergosit

  Adj - šihttui: # JIEDNAI
    šihttui+A+Attr: šihttos
    šihttui+A+Sg+Gen: šihtto
    šihttui+A+Sg+Ill: šihttui
    šihttui+A+Sg+Com: šihttuin
    šihttui+A+Pl+Com: šihttuiguin
    šihttui+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: šihttobuid
    šihttui+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: šihttojit
    šihttui+A+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth: šihttot
    
  Adj - coagis: # BOARIS
    coagis+A+Attr: coages
    coagis+A+Sg+Gen: coahkása
    coagis+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: coahkás
    coagis+A+Sg+Ill: coahkásii
    coagis+A+Sg+Com: coahkásiin
    coagis+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: coahkásiinna
    coagis+A+Pl+Com: coahkásiiguin
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [coahkáseappuid, coahkásabbuid]
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [coahkáseappuid, coahkásebbuid, coahkásabbuid]
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [coahkáseappuid, coahkásebbuid, coahkásabbuid]
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [coahkáseappuid, coahkásabbuid]
    coagis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: coahkásit

    
  Adj - govdat: # ALLAT
    govdat+A+Attr: [govda, govdes]
    govdat+A+Sg+Gen: [govdaga, govdada]
    govdat+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: govdat
    govdat+A+Sg+Ill: [govdagii, govdadii]
    govdat+A+Sg+Com: [govdagiin, govdadiin]
    govdat+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: [govdagiinna, govdadiinna]
    govdat+A+Pl+Com: [govdagiiguin, govdadiiguin]
    govdat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [govddibuid]
    govdat+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: govdadebbuid
    govdat+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [govdadabbuid, govdadeappuid, govdadebbuid]
    govdat+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [govdadabbuid, govdadeappuid, govdadebbuid]
    govdat+A+Err/Orth+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [govdadabbuid, govdadeappuid]
    govdat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [govdagit, govdadit]
    govdat+A+Err/Orth+Der/AAdv+Adv: govdadit


  Adj - guvrelágan: # LAGAN
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Attr:   guvrelágan
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Attr:   guvrelágán
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Attr:   guvrelagan
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Gen: guvrelágana
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: guvrelágan
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Gen: guvrelágána
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: guvrelágán
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen: guvrelagana
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: guvrelagan
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Ill: guvreláganii
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Ill: guvrelágánii
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill: guvrelaganii
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Com: guvreláganiin
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Com: guvrelágániin
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: guvreláganiinna
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: guvrelágániinna
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Com: guvrelaganiin
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: guvrelaganiinna
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: guvrelaganiid
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Pl+Com: guvreláganiiguin
    guvrelágan+v2+A+Pl+Com: guvrelágániiguin
    guvrelágan+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: guvrelaganiiguin

  Adj - goahccelágaš: # LAGAS
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Attr:   goahccelágaš
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Attr:   goahccelágáš
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Attr:   goahccelagaš
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Sg+Gen: goahccelágaža
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: goahccelágaš
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Sg+Gen: goahccelágáža
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: goahccelágáš
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen: goahccelagaža
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: goahccelagaš
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Sg+Ill: goahccelágažii
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Sg+Ill: goahccelágážii
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill: goahccelagažii
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Sg+Com: goahccelágažiin
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Sg+Com: goahccelágážiin
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: goahccelágažiinna
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: goahccelágážiinna
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Com: goahccelagažiin
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: goahccelagažiinna
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: goahccelagažiid
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Pl+Com: goahccelágažiiguin
    goahccelágaš+v2+A+Pl+Com: goahccelágážiiguin
    goahccelágaš+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: goahccelagažiiguin

  Adj - gohpevuđot: # AGAdj
    gohpevuđot+A+Attr: gohpevuđot
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Attr: gohpivuđot
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Gen: gohpevuđoga
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: gohpevuđot
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Sg+Gen: gohpivuđoga
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: gohpivuđot
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Ill: gohpevuđogii
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Sg+Ill: gohpivuđogii
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Com: gohpevuđogiin
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Sg+Com: gohpivuđogiin
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: gohpivuđogiinna
    gohpevuđot+A+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: gohpevuđogiinna
    gohpevuđot+A+Pl+Com: gohpevuđogiiguin
    gohpevuđot+Err/Lex+A+Pl+Com: gohpivuđogiiguin
